Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6319.22
Firm, defined.

Firm means a company, partnership, corporation, sole proprietorship, association, or other business entity that conducts lead-based paint abatement or abatement projects.

Laws 1999, LB 863, § 24.